Utah statutes.
31A-21-301.   Clauses required to be in a prominent position.

(1)  The following portions of insurance policies shall appear conspicuously in the policy:

(a)  as required by Subsection 31A-21-201(3)(a)(iii):

(i)  the exact name of the insurer;

(ii)  the state of domicile of the insurer; and

(iii)  for life insurance and annuity policies only, the address of the administrative office of the insurer;

(b)  information that two or more insurers under Subsection (1)(a) undertake only several liability, as required by Section 31A-21-306;

(c)  if a policy is assessable, a statement of that;

(d)  a statement that benefits are variable, as required by Section 31A-22-411; however, the methods of calculation need not be in a prominent position;

(e)  the right to return a life or accident and health insurance policy under Sections 31A-22-423 and 31A-22-606; and

(f)  the beginning and ending dates of insurance protection.

(2)  Each clause listed in Subsection (1) shall be displayed conspicuously and separately from any other clause.

